Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3550.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 290A.04, subdivision 2h, is amended to read: Subd. 2h. Additional refund. (a) If the gross property taxes payable on a homestead increase more than deleted text begin 12deleted text end new text begin eightnew text end percent over the property taxes payable in the prior year on the same property that is owned and occupied by the same owner on January 2 of both years, and the amount of that increase is $100 or more, a claimant who is a homeowner shall be allowed an additional refund equal to 60 percent of the amount of the increase over the greater of deleted text begin 12deleted text end new text begin eightnew text end percent of the prior year's property taxes payable or $100. This subdivision shall not apply to any increase in the gross property taxes payable attributable to improvements made to the homestead after the assessment date for the prior year's taxes. The maximum refund allowed under this subdivision is deleted text begin $1,000deleted text end new text begin $1,500new text end . (b) For purposes of this subdivision "gross property taxes payable" means property taxes payable determined without regard to the refund allowed under this subdivision. (c) In addition to the other proofs required by this chapter, each claimant under this subdivision shall file with the property tax refund return a copy of the property tax statement for taxes payable in the preceding year or other documents required by the commissioner. (d) Upon request, the appropriate county official shall make available the names and addresses of the property taxpayers who may be eligible for the additional property tax refund under this section. The information shall be provided electronically. The county may recover its costs by charging the person requesting the information the reasonable cost for preparing the data. The information may not be used for any purpose other than for notifying the homeowner of potential eligibility and assisting the homeowner, without charge, in preparing a refund claim. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for refund claims based on taxes payable in 2026 and thereafter. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin [295.90] SOCIAL MEDIA DATA COLLECTION EXCISE TAX. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Tax imposed. new text end new text begin A tax is imposed on the collection of consumer data by a social media platform business as provided under this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Rate of tax. new text end new text begin The tax is imposed on social media platform businesses based on the number of Minnesota social media platform consumers from whom a social media platform business collects data within a month: new text end new text begin Minnesota consumers new text end new text begin Tax new text end new text begin Fewer than or equal to 100,000 new text end new text begin Zero new text end new text begin Over 100,000 but not more than 500,000 new text end new text begin $0.10 per month on the number of Minnesota consumers over 100,000 but not more than 500,000 new text end new text begin Over 500,000 but not more than 1,000,000 new text end new text begin $40,000 plus $0.25 per month on the number of Minnesota consumers over 500,000 but not more than 1,000,000 new text end new text begin Over 1,000,000 new text end new text begin $165,000 plus $0.50 per month on the number of Minnesota consumers over 1,000,000 new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of revenue. new text end new text begin (c) "Consumer" means an individual who establishes an account on an app or website owned by a social media platform business whose consumer data is collected by the social media platform business, regardless of whether the individual is charged for establishing the account. new text end new text begin (d) "Consumer data" means any information that identifies, relates to, describes, is capable of being associated with, or could reasonably be linked with a consumer, whether directly submitted to the social media platform business by the consumer or derived from other sources. new text end new text begin (e) "Minnesota consumer" means a consumer who is a resident of Minnesota. new text end new text begin (f) "Resident" has the meaning given in section 290.01, subdivision 7. new text end new text begin (g) "Social media platform" has the meaning given in section 325M.31, paragraph (j). new text end new text begin (h) "Social media platform business" means a for-profit entity that operates a social media platform that engages, collects, maintains, uses, processes, sells, or shares consumer data in support of the entity's business activities and collects consumer data on more than 100,000 individual Minnesota consumers in a month within the calendar year. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Consumers. new text end new text begin (a) Until the contrary is established, it is presumed that a consumer whose information on record with or available to a social media platform business indicates a Minnesota home address, a Minnesota mailing address, or an internet protocol address connected with a Minnesota location is a Minnesota consumer for purposes of this section. The burden of proving that a consumer is not a Minnesota resident is on the social media platform business. new text end new text begin (b) A Minnesota consumer must be counted only once in the calculation of the monthly tax imposed on a social media platform business. new text end new text begin (c) Business entities that are part of a controlled group of corporations as defined in section 1563(a) of the Internal Revenue Code must be treated as a single entity for purposes of meeting the definition of a social media platform business under this section. new text end new text begin (d) The single member of a single member limited liability company must be treated as a consumer under this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Credit against tax paid to another jurisdiction. new text end new text begin A social media platform business that has paid tax under this section may claim a credit against the tax paid with respect to a Minnesota consumer if another state imposes an excise tax identical to the tax imposed under this section with respect to the same consumer. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Record keeping. new text end new text begin A social media platform business must maintain records as required by the commissioner. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Administration. new text end new text begin Unless specifically provided otherwise, the audit, assessment, refund, penalty, interest, enforcement, collection remedies, appeal, and administrative provisions of chapters 270C and 289A that are applicable to taxes imposed under chapter 297A apply to the tax imposed under this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Returns; payment of tax. new text end new text begin (a) A social media platform business must report the tax on a return prescribed by the commissioner and must remit the tax in a form and manner prescribed by the commissioner. The return and the tax must be filed and paid using the filing cycle and due dates provided for taxes imposed under section 289A.20, subdivision 4, and chapter 297A. new text end new text begin (b) Interest must be paid on an overpayment refunded or credited to the taxpayer from the date of payment of the tax until the date the refund is paid or credited. For purposes of this subdivision, the date of payment is the due date of the return or the date of actual payment of the tax, whichever is later. new text end new text begin Subd. 9. new text end new text begin Deposit of revenues. new text end new text begin The commissioner must deposit the revenues, including penalties and interest, derived from the tax imposed by this section in the general fund. new text end new text begin Subd. 10. new text end new text begin Personal debt. new text end new text begin The tax imposed by this section, and interest and penalties imposed with respect to it, are a personal debt of the person required to file a return from the time that the liability for it arises, irrespective of when the time for payment of the liability occurs. In the case of a fiduciary, the debt must be that of the person in the person's official or fiduciary capacity only, unless the person has voluntarily distributed the assets held in that capacity without reserving sufficient assets to pay the tax, interest, and penalties, in which event the person is personally liable for any deficiency. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for consumer data collected after December 31, 2026. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin 2026 PUBLIC SAFETY AID.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of revenue. new text end new text begin (c) "Local unit" means (1) a town with a population of at least 10,000, or (2) a statutory or home rule charter city. new text end new text begin (d) "Population" means population estimates made or conducted by the United States Bureau of the Census; the Metropolitan Council pursuant to Minnesota Statutes, section 473.24; or the state demographer pursuant to Minnesota Statutes, section 4A.02, paragraph (d), whichever is the most recent estimate available as of January 1, 2026. new text end new text begin (e) "Tribal governments" has the meaning given to "Minnesota Tribal governments" in Minnesota Statutes, section 10.65, subdivision 2, clause (4). new text end new text begin (f) "Tribal population" means population estimates made or conducted by the United States Bureau of the Census of the federally recognized American Indian reservations and off-reservation trust lands in Minnesota, whichever is the most recent estimate available as of January 1, 2026. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin County aid. new text end new text begin A county's public safety aid equals the sum of: new text end new text begin (1) the product of (i) the county's population, and (ii) the county basic allowance; plus new text end new text begin (2) the product of (i) the county's population minus the total population of every local unit located in that county, and (ii) the county additional allowance. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Tribal government aid. new text end new text begin A Tribal government's public safety aid equals the sum of: new text end new text begin (1) the product of (i) the Tribe's population, and (ii) the county basic allowance; plus new text end new text begin (2) the product of (i) the Tribe's population, and (ii) the county additional allowance. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Local unit aid. new text end new text begin A local unit's public safety aid equals the product of (1) the local unit's population, and (2) the local unit allowance. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Commissioner to calculate allowances. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner must calculate the county basic allowance so that the total amount of aid distributed under subdivision 2, clause (1), and subdivision 3, clause (1), equals 70 percent of the amount appropriated for aid to counties and Tribal governments under subdivision 8. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner must calculate the county additional allowance so that the total amount of aid distributed under subdivision 2, clause (2), and subdivision 3, clause (2), equals 30 percent of the amount appropriated for aid to counties and Tribal governments under subdivision 8. new text end new text begin (c) The commissioner must calculate the local unit allowance so that the total amount of aid distributed under subdivision 4 equals the amount appropriated for aid to local units under subdivision 8. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Eligible uses. new text end new text begin (a) A county, Tribal government, or local unit must use the aid under this section to provide public safety, including community violence prevention and intervention programs; community engagement; mental health crisis response; victim services; training programs; first responder wellness; fire, rescue, and emergency services equipment; or other personnel or equipment costs. new text end new text begin (b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a), a county, Tribal government, or local unit may not apply the aid under this section toward: new text end new text begin (1) an employer contribution to the public employees police and fire fund if the county, Tribal government, or local unit received police state aid under Minnesota Statutes, chapter 477C, in calendar year 2025; new text end new text begin (2) any costs associated with alleged wrongdoing or misconduct; new text end new text begin (3) the purchase of an armored or tactical vehicle or substantially similar vehicle; new text end new text begin (4) the purchase of tear gas, chemical munitions, or substantially similar items; or new text end new text begin (5) the construction, reconstruction, remodeling, expansion, or improvement of a police station, including related facilities. For purposes of this clause, "related facilities" includes access roads, lighting, sidewalks, and utility components on or adjacent to the property on which the police station is located that are necessary for safe access to and use of the building. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Certification; payment date. new text end new text begin The commissioner must certify the amount of public safety aid payable to each county, Tribal government, and local unit under this section by September 1, 2026. The commissioner must pay public safety aid to each county, Tribal government, and local unit by December 26, 2026. new text end new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin (a) $....... is appropriated in fiscal year 2027 from the general fund to the commissioner of revenue for public safety aid under this section. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end new text begin (b) Of the amount in paragraph (a), 30 percent is for aid to counties and Tribal governments and 70 percent is for aid to local units. new text end new text begin Subd. 9. new text end new text begin Report. new text end new text begin (a) By ....., 2027, each county, Tribal government, and local unit that receives public safety aid under this section must report the following information to the commissioner of public safety in the form and manner prescribed by the commissioner of public safety: new text end new text begin (1) the amount of aid received; and new text end new text begin (2) how the aid was used or is intended to be used. new text end new text begin (b) By ....., 2027, the commissioner of public safety must compile the information received from counties, Tribal governments, and local units under paragraph (a) and submit the compilation in a report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over public safety and taxes. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for aids payable in calendar year 2026. new text end